Oklahoma, session 2026, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 403 of Title 73, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Office of Management and Enterprise Services (OMES) to be
designated the “State Capitol Arch Memorial Statue Revolving Fund”.
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by OMES from
private donations, gifts, grants, or other sources of private
funding provided for the purpose of installing and maintaining
veteran memorial statues around the State Capitol Arch. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by OMES for the purpose provided for in
this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.

Passed the Senate the 13th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 162 Page 2